csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Ind_VV.yaml
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninibaasiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwebinigesiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiisiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginibaasiinaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwebinigesiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiisiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiidogena',nibaasiidogenan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiidogena',webinigesiidogenan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiidogena',madaabiisiidogenan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiidogena',maajiibatoosiidogenan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiidogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiidogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiidogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiidogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiidogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiidogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiidogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiidogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiidog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiidog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiidog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiidog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: ninibaasiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: ginibaasiiminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: nibaasiimwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: webinigesiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: madaabiisiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoosiimwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: ninibaanaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: niwebinigenaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoonaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: ginibaamwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: giwebinigemwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoomwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: ginibaanaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: giwebinigenaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoonaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [nibaadogena',nibaadogenan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [webinigedogena',webinigedogenan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiidogena',madaabiidogenan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoodogena',maajiibatoodogenan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: nibaadogenag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: webinigedogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiidogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoodogenag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: nibaadogenan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: webinigedogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiidogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoodogenan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: nibaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: webinigedog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiidog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoodog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: ninibaaminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: niwebinigeminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nimadaabiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoominaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: ginibaaminaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: giwebinigeminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: gimadaabiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoominaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: nibaamwaadog
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: webinigemwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: madaabiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoomwaadog
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiigwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiinigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaasiigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigesiigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: nibaagwaaban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: webinigegwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoogwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: nibaanigoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: webinigenigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: nibaagoban
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: webinigegoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogoban
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [ninibaasii,ninibaasiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [niwebinigesii,niwebinigesiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [nimadaabiisii,nimadaabiisiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [nimaajiibatoosii,nimaajiibatoosiin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwebinigesiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [ginibaasii,ginibaasiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [giwebinigesii,giwebinigesiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [gimadaabiisii,gimadaabiisiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [gimaajiibatoosii,gimaajiibatoosiin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nibaasiiwa',nibaasiiwan]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [webinigesiiwa',webinigesiiwan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiiwa',madaabiisiiwan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiiwa',maajiibatoosiiwan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaasiiwag
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: webinigesiiwag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaasiiwan
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: webinigesiiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiiwan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [nibaasii,nibaasiin]
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [webinigesii,webinigesiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [madaabiisii,madaabiisiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [maajiibatoosii,maajiibatoosiin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: ninibaasiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: niwebinigesiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: ginibaasiimin
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: giwebinigesiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: nibaasiim
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: webinigesiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: madaabiisiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoosiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: ninibaa
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: niwebinige
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nimadaabii
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoo
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginibaam
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: giwebinigem
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoom
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: ginibaa
     webinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: giwebinige
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: gimadaabii
